Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1175.
do enact as follows:SB1175,11Section 1. 103.465 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1175,2,32103.465 (title) Restrictive covenants in employment contracts; 3prohibitions.SB1175,24Section 2. 103.465 of the statutes is renumbered 103.465 (1) and amended to 5read:SB1175,2,146103.465 (1) Covenants in employment contracts not to compete. A 7covenant by an assistant, servant, employee, or agent not to compete with his or her 8employer or principal during the term of the employment or agency, or after the 9termination of that employment or agency, within a specified territory and during a 10specified time is lawful and enforceable only if the restrictions imposed are 11reasonably necessary for the protection of the employer or principal. Any covenant, 12described in this section, imposing subsection, that imposes an unreasonable 13restraint on trade is illegal, void, and unenforceable even as to any part of the 14covenant or performance that would be a reasonable restraint on trade.SB1175,315Section 3. 103.465 (2) and (3) of the statutes are created to read:SB1175,2,2116103.465 (2) Nondisparagement provisions in employment contract 17after termination of employment or agency prohibited. A provision in an 18employment contract that requires an assistant, servant, employee, or agent not to 19disparage his or her former employer or former principal in writing or in speech 20after the termination of the employment or agency imposes an unreasonable 21restraint on trade and is illegal, void, and unenforceable.SB1175,3,622(3) Notice posted. Each employer and principal shall post, in one or more 23conspicuous places where notices to assistants, servants, employees, and agents are 1customarily posted, and in a conspicuous place on the employer’s or principal’s 2website if the employer or principal maintains a website, a notice in a form 3approved by the department that explains that an employment contract provision 4that prohibits a former employee or agent from disparaging the employer or 5principal after termination of employment or agency is an unreasonable restraint 6on trade and is illegal, void, and unenforceable.SB1175,47Section 4. Initial applicability.SB1175,3,108(1) Nondisparagement provision in employment contracts. This act first 9applies to a nondisparagement provision in an employment contract that is entered 10into, extended, modified, or renewed on the effective date of this subsection.SB1175,3,1111